North Dakota, session 69, SB2212.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 15-54.1-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
15-54.1-01. University system capital building fund - Creation - Continuing
appropriation.
There is created in the state treasury the university system capital building fund. The
university system capital building fund consists of moneys transferred to the fund and any
interest and earnings of the fund. The state board of higher education may provide for the fund
to be invested under the supervision of the state investment board. Moneys in the fund are
appropriated to the state board of higher education on a continuing basis for allocations to the
institutions under the control of the state board of higher education for capital projects as
directed by the legislative assembly and in accordance with this chapter. Any interest or
earnings of the fund must be allocated to the capital building fund pool tier II for each institution
within the university system capital building fund and is subject to matching requirements under
this chapter.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 15-54.1-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
15-54.1-02. Capital building funds - Uses - Reports.
Subject to tier II and tier III capital building fund matching requirements under this chapter,
each institution may use its allocation of funds from the university system capital building fund
Page No. 1 25.1154.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
for projects specifically authorized by the legislative assembly to use university system capital
building fund moneys. In addition, after an institution has matched and committed seventy-five
percent of the funding appropriated for the institution's tier I extraordinary repairs and subject to
state board of higher education approval and matching requirements under this chapter, each
institution may use its tier I I allocation of funds from the university system capital building fund
for extraordinary repairs and deferred maintenance projects, including bond payments for these
projects, for academic and student housing facilities that do not increase the overall square
footage of a building. The state board of higher education shall report biennially to the legislative
management and to the appropriations committees of the legislative assembly on the use of
funding in the university system capital building fund, the source of matching funds, and each
institution's five-year plan for capital construction spending.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 15-54.1-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
15-54.1-03. Tier II capital building funds - Matching requirements.
The state board of higher education may allocate tier II capital building fund moneys to an
institution, excluding the university of North Dakota and North Dakota state university, for a
project only after the institution provides one dollar of matching funds from operations or other
sources for each one dollar from the university system capital building fund for the project. The
state board of higher education may allocate tier II capital building fund moneys to the university
of North Dakota and North Dakota state university for a project only after the institution provides
two dollars of matching funds from operations or other sources for each one dollar from the
university system capital building fund for the project. An institution may not use tier I
extraordinary repairs funding, tier III capital building fund moneys, or state funding appropriated
for a specific capital project as matching funds under this section.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 15-54.1-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
15-54.1-04. Tier III capital building funds - Matching requirements.
The state board of higher education may allocate tier III capital building fund moneys to an
institution, excluding the university of North Dakota and North Dakota state university, only after
the institution provides two dollarsone dollar of matching funds from operations or other sources
for each one dollarevery nine dollars from the university system capital building fund for the
Page No. 2 25.1154.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
project. The state board of higher education may allocate tier III capital building fund moneys to
the university of North Dakota and North Dakota state university for a project only after the
institution provides one dollar of matching funds from operations or other sources for every
two dollars from the university system capital building fund for the project . An institution may not
use tier I extraordinary repairs funding, tier II capital building fund moneys, or state funding
appropriated for a specific capital project as matching funds under this section.
SECTION 5. REPEAL. Section 15-54.1-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is repealed.
SECTION 6. TRANSFER - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND -
UNIVERSITY SYSTEM CAPITAL BUILDING FUND. The office of management and budget
shall transfer $65,000,000 from the strategic investment and improvements fund to the
university system capital building fund during the period beginning with the effective date of this
Act, and ending June 30, 2027, as requested by the commissioner of higher education. Funding
transferred pursuant to this section is to be allocated to each institution as follows:
Tier II Tier III Total
Bismarck state college $638,540 $3,500,000 $4,138,540
Lake Region state college 266,062 2,500,000 2,766,062
Williston state college 206,920 2,500,000 2,706,920
University of North Dakota 6,542,702 12,250,000 18,792,702
North Dakota state university 4,349,394 12,250,000 16,599,394
North Dakota state college of science 751,042 3,500,000 4,251,042
Dickinson state university 403,293 2,500,000 2,903,293
Mayville state university 360,044 2,500,000 2,860,044
Minot state university 859,202 3,500,000 4,359,202
Valley City state university 463,705 2,500,000 2,963,705
Dakota college at Bottineau 159,096 2,500,000 2,659,096
Total $15,000,000 $50,000,000 $65,000,000
SECTION 7. LEGISLATIVE INTENT - UNIVERSITY SYSTEM CAPITAL BUILDING
FUND - TIER III. It is the intent of the sixty-ninth legislative assembly that the seventieth
legislative assembly appropriate $80,000,000 from state funds for tier III of the university
system capital building fund for the biennium beginning July 1, 2027, and ending June 30, 2029.
Page No. 3 25.1154.02000